New York, session 2025-2026, A3337.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1005 of the public authorities law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 31 to read as follows: 3 31. The authority is authorized to allow the state of New York, and 4 its political subdivisions, including but not limited to, county govern- 5 ments, municipalities, towns, villages, special districts, school 6 districts and fire districts and not-for-profit corporations to bundle 7 electrical services. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01495-01-5